Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.091

Written instrument—Limit on characterization as testamentary.

(1) An otherwise effective written instrument of transfer may not be deemed testamentary solely because of a provision for a nonprobate transfer at death in the instrument.

(2) "Provision for a nonprobate transfer at death" as used in subsection (1) of this section includes, but is not limited to, a written provision that:

(a) Money or another benefit up to that time due to, controlled, or owned by a decedent before death must be paid after the decedent's death to a person whom the decedent designates either in the instrument or a separate writing, including a will, executed at any time;

(b) Money or another benefit due or to become due under the instrument ceases to be payable in the event of the death of the promisee or the promisor before payment or demand; or

(c) Property, controlled by or owned by the decedent before death, that is the subject of the instrument passes to a person the decedent designates either in the instrument or in a separate writing, including a will, executed at any time.

(3) "Otherwise effective written instrument of transfer" as used in subsection (1) of this section means: An insurance policy; a contract of employment; a bond; a mortgage; a promissory note; a certified or uncertified security; an account agreement; a compensation plan; a pension plan; an individual retirement plan; an employee benefit plan; a joint tenancy; a community property agreement; a trust; a conveyance; a deed of gift; a contract; or another written instrument of a similar nature that would be effective if it did not contain provision for a nonprobate transfer at death.

(4) This section only eliminates a requirement that instruments of transfer comply with formalities for executing wills under chapter 11.12 RCW. This section does not make a written instrument effective as a contract, gift, conveyance, deed, or trust that would not otherwise be effective as such for reasons other than failure to comply with chapter 11.12 RCW.

(5) This section does not limit the rights of a creditor under other laws of this state.

[ 1993 c 291 s 2.]